Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2317
Nebraska Wheat
Development, Utilization, and Marketing Fund; created; use; investment.

The Nebraska Wheat Development, Utilization, and Marketing
Fund is created. All taxes collected by the board pursuant to the Nebraska
Wheat Resources Act and any repayments relating to the fund, including license
fees or royalties, shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to
the fund. The fund shall be used to carry out the act. The board
shall at each regular meeting review and approve all expenditures made since
its last regular meeting. Any money in the fund available for investment shall
be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1955, c. 5, § 17, p. 64;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 30, p. 2359;

Laws 1981, LB 11, § 33;

Laws 1983, LB 53, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 1, § 14;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 11;

Laws 2012, LB905, § 8.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.